ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 생활용품: 서랍/선반 깔개; 바닥 보호용 필름/러너; 바닥 긁힘 방지 용품; 차고 바닥 매트; 쓰레기 봉투; 가정용 청소물품; 가정용 종이 제품; 가정용 온도계; 세탁용품; 제습제; 해충 방제; 러그 커버; 러그 패드; 신발 관리 도구; 계단 디딤면; 수납/정리용품; 쓰레기 압축기 부대용품; 폐기물 매립; 폐기물 매립 부대용품
sv: Hem och trädgård > Hushållsutrustning: Låd- och hyllpapper och -plast; Golvskyddsplast och gångmattor; Golvskydd till möbler; Garagegolvsmattor; Soppåsar; Rengöringsutrustning för hushåll; Pappersprodukter för hemmet; Termometrar för hemmet; Tvättutrustning; Fuktabsorberare; Skadedjursbekämpning; Mattöverdrag; Halkskydd för mattor; Skovård och skoverktyg; Trappmattor; Förvaring och organisation; Tillbehör till avfallspressar; Avfallshantering; Tillbehör till avfallshantering
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsartikler: Hyldepapir; Løbere og beskyttelsesfilm til gulv; Filtpuder til møbler; Måtter til garager; Skraldeposer; Rengøringsmidler; Husholdningspapir; Husholdningstermometre; Vaskemidler; Fugtabsorbering; Skadedyrsbekæmpelse; Tæppebetræk; Tæppeunderlag; Skopleje og redskaber; Tæpper til trappetrin; Opbevaring og organisering; Tilbehør til affaldskværne; Skraldopbevaring; Skraldopbevaring – tilbehør
nb: Hjem og hage > Husholdningsartikler: Innlegg til skuffer og hyller; Gulvbeskyttelsesfilm og -tepper; Møbelbeskyttere for gulv; Matter for garasjegulv; Søppelsekker; Rengjøringsmidler for husbruk; Papirprodukter for husholdningsbruk; Husholdningstermometre; Vaskeprodukter; Fuktighetsabsorberere; Skadedyrkontroll; Teppetrekk; Undertepper; Skopleie og -verktøy; Trappetrinn; Lagring og organisering; Tilbehør til avfallskomprimerere; Avfallsoppbevaring; Tilbehør for avfallsoppbevaring
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartási kellékek: Fiók- és polcbélések; Padlóvédő fóliák és futók; Bútor padlóvédők; Garázs padlószőnyegek; Szemeteszsákok; Háztartási tisztítókellékek; Háztartási papírtermékek; Háztartási hőmérők; Mosodai kellékek; Nedvességelnyelők; Kártevőirtás; Szőnyeghuzatok; Szőnyegalátétek; Cipőápolás és -eszközök; Lépcsőfokvédők; Tárolás és rendezés; Szemetestömörítő kiegészítők; Hulladékelszigetelés; Hulladékgyűjtő-kiegészítők
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Sarf Malzemeleri: Çekmece ve Raf Kaplamaları; Zemin Koruma Filmleri ve Yollukları; Mobilyalar için Zemin Koruyucular; Garaj Zemin Döşemeleri; Çöp Poşetleri; Ev Temizlik Malzemeleri; Ev Kağıt Ürünleri; Ev Termometreleri; Çamaşırhane Sarf Malzemeleri; Nem Emiciler; Haşere Kontrolü; Halı Örtüleri; Halı Altlıkları; Ayakkabı Bakım ve Aletleri; Merdiven Kaydırmazları; Saklama ve Düzenleme; Çöp Sıkıştırıcı Aksesuarları; Çöp Muhafazası; Çöp Muhafazası Aksesuarları
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์ใช้ในบ้าน: ที่รองลิ้นชักและชั้น; ฟิล์มและรันเนอร์ป้องกันพื้น; ที่ป้องกันพื้นสำหรับเฟอร์นิเจอร์; เสื่อปูโรงรถ; ถุงขยะ; อุปกรณ์ทำความสะอาดในบ้าน; ผลิตภัณฑ์กระดาษในบ้าน; เทอร์โมมิเตอร์สำหรับใช้ในบ้าน; อุปกรณ์ซักผ้า; ที่ดูดความชื้น; การควบคุมสัตว์รบกวน; ผ้าคลุมพรม; แผ่นรองพรม; เครื่องมือและการดูแลรองเท้า; ที่รองบันได; การจัดเก็บและการจัดระเบียบ; อุปกรณ์เครื่องอัดขยะ; ถังขยะ; อุปกรณ์ถังขยะ
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Είδη οικιακής χρήσης: Επενδύσεις συρταριών & ραφιών; Μεμβράνες & δρομείς προστασίας δαπέδου; Προστατευτικά δαπέδου επίπλων; Χαλάκια δαπέδου γκαράζ; Σακούλες απορριμμάτων; Είδη καθαρισμού οικίας; Χαρτικά οικιακής χρήσης; Θερμόμετρα οικιακής χρήσης; Είδη πλυντηρίου; Απορροφητές υγρασίας; Έλεγχος παρασίτων; Καλύμματα χαλιών; Υποστρώματα χαλιών; Είδη & εργαλεία περιποίησης υποδημάτων; Προστατευτικά σκαλοπατιών; Αποθήκευση & οργάνωση; Αξεσουάρ συμπιεστών απορριμμάτων; Διαχείριση απορριμμάτων; Αξεσουάρ περιορισμού απορριμμάτων
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Potreby pre domácnosť: Vložky do zásuviek a políc; Fólie a lišty na ochranu podlahy; Podlahové chrániče nábytku; Garážové rohože; Vrecia na odpadky; Čistiace prostriedky pre domácnosť; Papierové výrobky pre domácnosť; Interiérové teplomery; Potreby pre údržbu bielizne; Pohlcovače vlhkosti; Ochrana proti škodcom; Chrániče kobercov; Podložky na koberce; Nástroje na starostlivosť o obuv; Nášľapy na schody; Skladovanie a organizácia; Príslušenstvo k stláčacím košom na odpadky; Nakladanie s odpadom; Príslušenstvo pre nakladanie s odpadom
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsbedarf: Auskleidung für Schubladen & Regale; Fußbodenschutzfolien & -läufer; Möbelgleiter; Garagenmatten; Müllbeutel; Reinigungsutensilien; Hygienepapiere; Haushaltsthermometer; Wäschepflege; Trocknungsmittel; Schädlingsbekämpfung; Teppichbezüge; Teppichunterlagen; Schuhpflege; Stufenteppiche; Aufbewahrung & Ordnungssysteme; Müllpressezubehör; Abfallbehälter; Abfallbehälterzubehör
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Produse de uz casnic: Inserții pentru sertare și rafturi; Pelicule pentru podea și traverse de protecție; Inserții pentru mobilier pentru protecția pardoselii; Covorașe pentru garaj; Saci de gunoi; Produse de curățare pentru casă; Produse de uz casnic din hârtie; Termometre de uz casnic; Produse pentru spălat rufe; Absorbante de umiditate; Combaterea dăunătorilor; Huse pentru covoare; Covorașe pentru mochetă; Produse și instrumente pentru îngrijirea încălțămintei; Trepte de scară; Depozitare și organizare; Accesorii pentru compactoare de gunoi; Depozitarea deșeurilor; Accesorii pentru depozitarea deșeurilor
en: Home & Garden > Household Supplies: Drawer & Shelf Liners; Floor Protection Films & Runners; Furniture Floor Protectors; Garage Floor Mats; Garbage Bags; Household Cleaning Supplies; Household Paper Products; Household Thermometers; Laundry Supplies; Moisture Absorbers; Pest Control; Rug Covers; Rug Pads; Shoe Care & Tools; Stair Treads; Storage & Organization; Trash Compactor Accessories; Waste Containment; Waste Containment Accessories
fr: Maison et jardin > Produits ménagers: Revêtements pour tiroirs et étagères; Films de protection pour sols; Patins et embouts pour piètements de meubles; Revêtements de sol de garage; Sacs poubelle; Nettoyage maison; Produits en papier pour la maison; Thermomètres domestiques; Produits de blanchisserie; Absorbeurs d’humidité; Désinsectisation; Housses de tapis; Thibaudes; Entretien et accessoires pour chaussures; Revêtements de marches; Rangement et organisation; Accessoires pour compacteurs à déchets; Conditionnement des déchets; Accessoires pour conteneurs à déchets
cs: Dům a zahrada > Potřeby pro domácnosti: Podložky do zásuvek a na police; Ochranné fólie a papíry na podlahu; Ochranné podložky pod nábytek; Podlahové krytiny do garáže; Pytle na odpadky; Čisticí potřeby pro domácnost; Papírové výrobky pro domácnost; Domácí teploměry; Potřeby pro praní; Pohlcovače vlhkosti; Hubení škůdců; Kryty na koberce; Podložky pod koberce; Pomůcky pro péči o obuv; Nášlapy na schody; Uskladnění a uspořádání; Příslušenství k drtičům odpadu; Odpadní nádoby; Odpadní nádoby – příslušenství
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kotitaloustarvikkeet: Laatikko- ja hyllypaperit; Lattian suojakalvot ja -käytävämatot; Huonekalutassut; Autotallin suojamatot; Roskapussit; Siivoustarvikkeet; Paperituotteet kotiin; Sisälämpömittarit; Pyykinpesutarvikkeet; Kosteudenpoistajat; Tuholaistorjunta; Mattosuojat; Liukuestematot; Kenkien hoito ja välineet; Porrasmatot; Varasto ja säilytys; Roskapuristimen lisätarvikkeet; Jätteiden käsittely; Jätesäiliöiden lisätarvikkeet
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Artigos para o lar: Revestimentos para gavetas e prateleiras; Películas e passadeiras de proteção do pavimento; Protetores do pavimento para mobília; Tapetes para garagem; Sacos do lixo; Artigos de limpeza para o lar; Produtos de papel para o lar; Termómetros para casa; Artigos de limpeza para lavar roupa; Absorventes de humidade; Controlo de pragas; Coberturas para tapete; Antiderrapantes para tapete; Utensílios e cuidado de calçado; Degraus de escadas; Armazenamento e organização; Acessórios de compactador de lixo; Eliminação de resíduos; Acessórios para eliminação de resíduos
pl: Dom i ogród > Artykuły gospodarstwa domowego: Materiały do wykładania szuflad i półek; Tymczasowe zabezpieczenia podłóg; Podkładki ochronne pod meble; Maty garażowe; Worki na śmieci; Artykuły domowe do sprzątania; Produkty papierowe do gospodarstwa domowego; Termometry domowe; Artykuły do pralni; Pochłaniacze wilgoci; Dezynsekcja; Pokrowce na dywany; Podkładki pod dywany; Środki i narzędzia do pielęgnacji obuwia; Nakładki na schody; Przechowywanie i utrzymanie porządku; Akcesoria do zgniatarek śmieci; Przechowywanie śmieci; Akcesoria do przechowywania śmieci
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Suprimentos domésticos: Forros para prateleiras e gavetas; Películas protetoras de pisos e passadeiras; Feltro protetor de piso; Tapetes para garagem; Sacos de lixo; Materiais para limpeza doméstica; Produtos domésticos de papel; Termômetros domésticos; Suprimentos de lavandeira; Absorvedores de umidade; Controle de peste; Capas de tapete; Almofadões; Manutenção e ferramentas para sapatos; Tapetes antiderrapantes para degraus; Armazenamento e organização; Acessórios para compressor de lixo; Contenção de resíduos; Acessórios para lixeira
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Gospodinjski pripomočki: Vložki za predale in police; Zaščitne folije in tekači za tla; Zaščitne podloge za pohištvo; Garažne talne obloge; Vreče za smeti; Gospodinjska čistila; Papirnati izdelki za gospodinjstvo; Gospodinjski termometri; Pripomočki za pranje perila; Absorberji vlage; Zatiranje škodljivcev; Prevleke za preproge; Podloge za preproge; Nega obutve in orodja; Tekači za stopnice; Shranjevanje in organizacija; Dodatki za stiskalnice za odpadke; Shranjevanje odpadkov; Dodatki za shranjevanje odpadkov
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Potrepštine za kućanstvo: Obloge za ladice i police; Folije i staze za zaštitu podova; Zaštite za podove za namještaj; Garažni tepisi; Vreće za smeće; Oprema za čišćenje kućanstva; Papirnati proizvodi za kućanstvo; Termometri za kućanstvo; Potrepštine za pranje rublja; Upijanje vlage; Suzbijanje štetočina; Zaštite za tepihe; Podloške za tepihe; Njega cipela i dodaci; Gazišta za stepenice; Odlaganje i organizacija; Pribor za dobilicu smeća; Spremnici za otpad; Pribor za spremnike za otpad
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 居家生活用品: 抽屜/書櫃襯墊; 地板貼膜; 家具地板保護墊; 車庫地板保護墊; 垃圾袋; 居家清潔用品; 家庭用紙; 室內溫度計; 洗衣用品; 濕氣吸附劑; 害蟲防治; 地毯套; 地毯防滑墊; 鞋子保養工具; 樓梯防滑墊; 儲藏和收納; 垃圾擠壓配件; 垃圾桶; 垃圾容器配件
nl: Huis en tuin > Huishoudelijke benodigdheden: Kastpapier; Beschermfolie en -lopers voor vloeren; Meubelglijders; Garagematten; Vuilniszakken; Schoonmaakmiddelen voor het huishouden; Papieren huishoudelijke artikelen; Huishoudelijke thermometers; Wasbenodigdheden; Vochtvreters; Ongediertebestrijding; Mathoezen; Antislipmatten; Schoenverzorging; Trapmatten; Opruimen en organiseren; Accessoires voor afvalpersen; Afvalverwerking; Accessoires voor afvalbakken
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Namų apyvokos reikmenys: Stalčių ir lentynų įdėklai; Grindų apsauginės plėvelės ir paklotai; Grindų apsaugos baldams; Garažo grindų kilimėliai; Šiukšlių maišai; Buitiniai valymo reikmenys; Buitiniai popieriaus gaminiai; Buitiniai termometrai; Skalbimo reikmenys; Drėgmės sugėrikliai; Kenkėjų kontrolė; Kilimėlių užvalkalai; Kilimėlių paklotai; Batų priežiūra ir įrankiai; Laiptų pakopos; Sandėliavimas ir tvarkymas; Atliekų tankintuvų priedai; Atliekų surinkimas; Atliekų surinkimo priedai
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Битови консумативи: Подложки за чекмеджета и рафтове; Подови защитни покрития и пътеки; Предпазители за под за мебели; Гаражни постелки; Торби за боклук; Домакински почистващи консумативи; Домакински хартиени изделия; Домашни термометри; Консумативи за пране; Абсорбатори на влага; Борба с вредители; Покривала за килими; Подложки за килими; Грижа за обувки и пособия; Подложки за стълбища; Съхранение и организация; Аксесоари за кош за компресиране на отпадъци; Ограничаване на отпадъците; Аксесоари за събиране на отпадъци
it: Casa e giardino > Forniture domestiche: Rivestimenti per cassetti e scaffali; Pellicole e passatoie di protezione per pavimenti; Protezioni per mobili per pavimento; Rivestimenti per pavimenti di garage; Sacchetti spazzatura; Articoli pulizia casa; Prodotti per la casa; Termometri per la casa; Forniture lavanderia; Assorbitori di umidità; Controllo infestanti; Coperture per tappeti; Sottotappeto; Cura delle scarpe; Antiscivolo per scale; Immagazzinamento e organizzazione; Accessori compattatori rifiuti; Contenimento rifiuti; Accessori per contenimento rifiuti
ru: Дом и сад > Хозяйственные товары: Коврики для ящиков и полок; Пленка и дорожки для защиты пола; Накладки на ножки мебели; Коврики для гаражей; Мешки для мусора; Бытовые чистящие средства и инвентарь для уборки; Бумажные изделия; Бытовые термометры; Товары для стирки, сушки и глажки; Поглотители влаги; Борьба с вредителями; Чехлы на ковер; Подложки под ковер; Товары для ухода за обувью; Накладки на ступени; Хранение вещей; Аксессуары для прессов для мусора; Емкости для сбора отходов; Аксессуары для емкостей для сбора отходов
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家居用品: 抽屉/搁板衬垫; 地板保护膜和保护垫; 家具脚垫/地垫; 车库地垫; 垃圾袋; 家居清洁用品; 家用纸制品; 室温计; 洗衣用品; 吸湿器; 害虫防治; 地毯套; 地毯垫/毛毯垫; 鞋类保养/工具; 楼梯踏板; 储物/收纳; 垃圾压缩机配件; 垃圾收纳; 垃圾桶/存放用品配件
es: Casa y jardín > Productos del hogar: Forros para cajones y estanterías; Láminas y franjas protectoras para suelos; Protectores del suelo para mobiliario; Alfombras para suelos de garajes; Bolsas de basura; Productos de limpieza para el hogar; Productos de papel para el hogar; Termómetros para la casa; Productos para lavado de ropa; Absorbedores de humedad; Control de plagas; Fundas para alfombras; Acolchado para alfombras; Cuidado del calzado; Alfombrillas para escalones; Organización y almacenamiento; Accesorios para compactadora de basura; Contenedores de residuos; Accesorios para contenedores de residuos
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 日用品: 引き出し・棚用シート; 床養生シート・マット; 家具用キズ防止グッズ; ガレージ用フロアマット; ゴミ袋; 掃除用品; 家庭用紙製品; 家庭用温度計; 洗濯用品; 除湿剤; 害虫・ねずみ駆除; ラグカバー; ラグ用下敷き; 靴のお手入れ; 階段用滑り止めマット; 収納; ゴミ圧縮機関連用品; ゴミ箱用品; ゴミ箱関連用品
vi: Nhà và vườn > Sản phẩm gia dụng: Giấy lót ngăn kéo; Thảm & phim lót sàn; Bọc chân bàn, ghế chống trầy sàn; Thảm trải sàn ga-ra; Túi rác; Dụng cụ lau dọn gia dụng; Sản phẩm giấy gia dụng; Nhiệt kế gia dụng; Sản phẩm giặt là; Hộp hút ẩm; Diệt mối, côn trùng; Tấm phủ thảm; Tấm lót thảm; Dụng cụ chăm sóc giày; Tấm ốp cầu thang; Đồ chứa và dụng cụ sắp xếp đồ; Phụ kiện máy ép rác; Đồ chứa rác; Phụ kiện đồ đựng rác